Alabama, session 2026rs, HB631.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Section 45-28-120, Code of Alabama 1975,
requiring Etowah County to pay health insurance premiums of
laid-off employees, is repealed.
(b) Section 45-28-140, Code of Alabama 1975,
authorizing the county commission, by resolution, to allow
certain charitable and volunteer organizations to have
equipment repaired and to purchase gasoline or motor fuel from
the county at cost, is repealed.
(c) Section 45-28-160, Code of Alabama 1975,
authorizing any county officer or person designated to draw
warrants or checks on the county treasury to use mechanical or
facsimile devices for signatures on warrants or checks, is
repealed.
(d) Section 45-28-220, Code of Alabama 1975, requiring
every applicant for a license to hold a public concert or
other event to have written prior approval from the Etowah
County Commission two weeks before the date of the event, is
repealed.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
HB631 Enrolled








________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 31-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 09-Apr-26 Passed



Page 2